North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 5A. Center for Advancement of Teaching. [Repealed]

§ 116-74.6.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 115C-296.5

by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.13(b), effective July 1, 2009.

§ 116-74.7.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 115C-296.6

by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.13(d), effective July 1, 2009.

§§ 116-74.8 through 116-74.20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.